hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧнмоз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмся/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмсяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмті/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтор/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыдлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйын/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйынӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторйысьӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторла/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторладор/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторладорас/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторладорӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторладорсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторладорсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторладорын/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторладорыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьын/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланьысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланям/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторланяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторлаыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторлаыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторлӧнӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнад/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнам/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнас/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныдлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнымкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнымла/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнымлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнымлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнымлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнымлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнымӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторнысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторся/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторсяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторті/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмтортӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъядӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъям/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъямӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъянӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяныдӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъянымӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъянысӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяса/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясад/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясам/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясанӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясас/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясбердса/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясбердсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясбӧрса/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясбӧрсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясвесьтса/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясвесьтсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясводзса/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясводзсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясвывса/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясвывсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясгӧгӧрса/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясгӧгӧрсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясдорса/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясдорсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяскостса/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяскостсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясла/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъяслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясланьным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясланьныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясланьӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясланьӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясланьӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V6 ны ӧмторъясланьӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
