hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
эжны/U1V1V3V5V6
чапны/U1V1V3V5V6
нюкыр-някыркерны/U1V1V3V5V6
ышловкерны/U1V1V3V5V6
довквӧчны/U1V1V3V5V6
нюж-няжвӧчны/U1V1V3V5V6
децентрализуйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
предохранитны/U2V1V4V5V6
челядьмӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
штрихуйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
отзовитны/U2V1V4V5V6
восклицайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
лӧвтӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
сырйӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
прекратитны/U2V1V4V5V6
краджмунны/U2V1V4V5V6
зяльӧдчыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
мушвидзыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
шматюритны/U2V1V4V5V6
описывайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
трекайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
распуститны/U2V1V4V5V6
дзобӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
гольгӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
вильдӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
сандалиӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
посйӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
чупкӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
вачкӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
юкӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
мездмӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
сукмӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
сёрмӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
унзільмӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
вӧйпӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
исӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
пӧгибнитӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
суктӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
турбыльтӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
вӧччӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
лёзьӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
брольӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
вийсьӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
пурсьӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
лудны/U2V1V4V5V6
сюв-сявмунны/U2V1V4V5V6
тшӧкмунны/U2V1V4V5V6
шармунны/U2V1V4V5V6
гальсмунны/U2V1V4V5V6
векышмунны/U2V1V4V5V6
тэсны/U2V1V4V5V6
конъёвтны/U2V1V4V5V6
лунтӧвтны/U2V1V4V5V6
отравитны/U2V1V4V5V6
ведитны/U2V1V4V5V6
унежитны/U2V1V4V5V6
галитны/U2V1V4V5V6
поромитны/U2V1V4V5V6
тшенитны/U2V1V4V5V6
ливкнитны/U2V1V4V5V6
ымкнитны/U2V1V4V5V6
кыркнитны/U2V1V4V5V6
перевыполнитны/U2V1V4V5V6
колснитны/U2V1V4V5V6
жвачнитны/U2V1V4V5V6
шытьнитны/U2V1V4V5V6
семинаритны/U2V1V4V5V6
рӧзӧритны/U2V1V4V5V6
ӧтметитны/U2V1V4V5V6
маклачитны/U2V1V4V5V6
перепишитны/U2V1V4V5V6
пӧкаживайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
передайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
шморкайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
микрайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
модничайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
посещайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
барствуйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
минерализуйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
насилуйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
тиражируйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
драматизируйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
патрулируйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
узурпируйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
репетируйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
татуируйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
коксуйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
сияйтны/U2V1V4V5V6
гызымтны/U2V1V4V5V6
чепӧртны/U2V1V4V5V6
пыртны/U2V1V4V5V6
чарӧстны/U2V1V4V5V6
шлывгыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
кургыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
рӧмдыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
рудӧдыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
сайкӧдыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
уськӧдыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
чӧсмӧдыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
вӧрӧдыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
качӧдыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
дэльӧдыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
сэжыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
лиыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
чирйыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
тяпкыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
шешкыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
сибдалыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
тшакалыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
йӧлалыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
суналыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
юмбыралыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
мурталыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
пельгӧдлыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
гӧрдлыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
палялыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
гусялыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
таркъялыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
слабмыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
дзескаммыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
нярмыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
чиныштны/U2V1V4V5V6
гӧгӧрвоыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
турыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
мыськовтыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
урвитыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
здрӧгнитыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
лапнитыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
веритыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
зевайтыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
стращайтыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
паяйтыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
сёртыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
чепӧстыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
суыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
ӧшйӧдчыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
кышӧдчыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
шашаритчыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
тіткыртчыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
гызьыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
тунасьыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
дӧмсьыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
вештысьыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
ваджгыльтны/U2V1V4V5V6
шалскӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
воспринимайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
клянитны/U2V1V4V5V6
подбитны/U2V1V4V5V6
троннитны/U2V1V4V5V6
глӧвкнитны/U2V1V4V5V6
зарабатывайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
сьӧмдалыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
китшӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
зургӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
чопйӧдлыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
приукраситны/U2V1V4V5V6
раскалывайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
зуньгыртны/U2V1V4V5V6
лӧньлыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
изӧймӧдны/U2V1V4V5V6
раскрывайтны/U2V1V4V5V6
троньгыштны/U2V1V4V5V6
анализасьны/U3V2V5V6
арйысьны/U3V2V5V6
торпыригасьны/U3V2V5V6
туплиасьны/U3V2V5V6
кучкасьны/U3V2V5V6
сутшласьны/U3V2V5V6
турунасьны/U3V2V5V6
зурасьны/U3V2V5V6
октасьны/U3V2V5V6
шуры-мурыасьны/U3V2V5V6
бӧрддзысьны/U3V2V5V6
тюльскысьны/U3V2V5V6
суктысьны/U3V2V5V6
чиклясьны/U3V2V5V6
тувъясьны/U3V2V5V6
вичкоасьны/U3V2V5V6
лёззясьны/U3V2V5V6
банаасьны/U3V2V5V6
гарчикылясьны/U3V2V5V6
балсвидзны/U5V1V3V5V6
тёпвидзны/U5V1V3V5V6
бруньвидзны/U5V1V3V5V6
